zh-CN: 耳环扣合类型: 球状耳堵; 咔嗒式卡口; 耳夹; 连续耳圈; 耳骨夹; 耳环后挂式（Ear jacket）; 鱼钩; 法式耳钩 / 法式耳线; 铰链式耳圈 / 搭扣式; 弹簧卡口; 法式耳扣; 磁吸; 无; 欧米茄式耳夹; 耳钉 / 推拉式耳堵（蝴蝶扣）; 马鞍扣; 螺旋耳堵; 穿线式; 其他
hu: Fülbevaló zártípusa: Golyós végű; Kattintós; Klipszes; Zárt karika; Fülgyűrű; Fülbevaló dzseki; Akasztós; Francia kapocs / Francia drót; Zsanéros karika / Patentos; Bepattintós; Francia kapcsos; Mágneses; Nincs; Omega klipsz; Bedughatós / Pillangókapcsos; Nyeregzáras; Csavaros; Átfűzős / Láncos fülbevaló; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de închidere a cercelului: Închizătoare bilă; Închizătoare tip clicker; Cu clips; Cercel tip verigă continuă; Ear cuff; Ear jacket; Tortiță; Tortiță franțuzească; Verigă cu balama; Închizătoare cu pârghie; Leverback; Magnetică; Fără; Închizătoare Omega; Cu șurub / fluturaș; Închizătoare saddleback; Cu înfiletare; Cu lănțișor; Altele
vi: Loại khuy cài khuyên tai: Chốt bi tròn; Chốt bấm (clicker); Dạng kẹp; Khuyên tròn liền; Khuyên kẹp vành tai; Khuyên kẹp sau nụ; Móc câu; Móc chữ U (French wire); Khuyên tròn có bản lề / chốt cài; Chốt gập khóa; Chốt bật (leverback); Từ tính; Không có; Chốt kẹp chữ omega; Chuôi cắm / chốt bướm; Chốt càng cua (saddle back); Chốt vặn ốc; Xâu sợi (threader); Khác
sv: Stängningstyp för sele: Kulknopp; Klicklås; Clips; Kontinuerlig ring; Earcuff; Ear jacket-bakstycke; Fiskkrok; Fransk krok/fransk tråd; Gångjärnsring/knäpplås; Spärrlås; Brissur; Magnetisk; Ingen; Omegaklipps; Stift/snurrebuss; Sadellås; Skruvlås; Trädare; Övrigt
it: Tipo di chiusura dell'orecchino: Chiusura a pallina; Chiusura a scatto; A clip; Cerchio continuo; Ear cuff; Chiusura ear jacket; A monachella; A monachella / monachella francese; Cerchio con cerniera / a scatto; Chiusura a scattino; Monachella chiusa; Magnetica; Nessuna; Chiusura omega; Perno / a farfallina; Chiusura a sella; Chiusura a vite; A catenella; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de fecho do brinco: Fecho em bola; Fecho clicker; De mola; Argola contínua; Ear cuff; Fecho ear jacket; Gancho de peixe; Gancho francês/arame francês; Argola articulada/mola; Fecho de patilha; Fecho de alavanca; Magnético; Nenhum; Fecho ómega; Espigão/pressão (borboleta); Fecho em sela; Fecho de rosca; Fio passante; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de fecho do brinco: Tarraxa de bola; Clicker; De pressão; Argola contínua; Ear cuff; Tarraxa de ear jacket; Gancho tipo anzol; Gancho francês/fio francês; Argola com dobradiça/pressão; Fecho inglês; Gatilho/gancho fechado; Magnético; Nenhum; Fecho ômega; Pino/tarraxa (borboleta); Fecho sela; Tarraxa de rosquear; Fio passante; Outro
el: Τύπος κλεισίματος σκουλαρικιού: Κούμπωμα με μπίλια; Κούμπωμα clicker; Με κλιπ; Συνεχόμενος κρίκος; Ear cuff; Ear jacket; Κούμπωμα γάντζος; Γαλλικό κούμπωμα (hook / wire); Κρίκος με μεντεσέ / snap; Κούμπωμα ασφαλείας; Κούμπωμα με μοχλό (leverback); Μαγνητικό; Κανένα; Κούμπωμα ωμέγα; Καρφάκι / πεταλούδα; Saddle back; Βιδωτό κούμπωμα; Threader; Άλλο
fr: Type de fermoir de boucle d'oreille: Fermoir à bille; Cliquet; À clip; Créole continue; Bague d’oreille; Jacket d’oreille; Hameçon; Crochet français / fil français; Créole à charnière / cliquet; Fermoir à loquet; Dormeuse; Magnétique; Aucun; Fermoir oméga; Poussette / papillon; Fermoir selle; Fermoir à vis; À enfiler; Autre
lt-LT: Auskarų užspaudimo tipas: Su rutuliuku; Užfiksuojamas; Segtukas; Ištisinis žiedas; Ausies lankelis; Ausies švarkelis („ear jacket“); Kabliukas; Prancūziškas kabliukas; Atlenkiamas žiedas / užspaudžiamas; Angliškas užsegimas; Svirtelinis užsegimas; Magnetinis; Nėra; Omega tipo užsegimas; Ikišamas / prispaudžiamas (drugelis); Balnelio tipo; Užsukamas; Perveriamas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta zapenjanja uhanov: S kroglico na navoj; Klik (clicker); Na sponko (clip-on); Neprekinjen obroč; Zaponka za uho (ear cuff); Zadnji del za pod uho (ear jacket); Odprta zanka (fish hook); Francoska zaponka (French hook); Obroč s tečajem/zaskočni; Zaskočno zapiranje (latch back); Zapiranje na patent (leverback); Magnetno; Brez; Omega zapenjanje; Igličasti metuljček (push back); Sedlasto zapiranje (saddle back); Na navoj; Navleček (threader); Drugo
ja: イヤリング留め具タイプ: ボールバック; クリッカー; クリップ式; コンティニュアスフープ; イヤーカフ; イヤージャケットバック; フィッシュフック; フレンチフック / フレンチワイヤー; ヒンジ付きフープ / スナップ; ラッチバック; レバーバック; マグネット; なし; オメガバック; ポスト / キャッチ式 (バタフライ); サドルバック; ネジ式キャッチ; スレッダー; その他
ko: 귀걸이 잠금 유형: 볼 백; 클리커; 클립형; 원터치 링; 이어 커프; 이어 자켓 백; 피쉬 훅; 프렌치 훅/프렌치 와이어; 힌지 링/스냅; 래치 백; 레버백; 자석형; 없음; 오메가 백; 포스트/푸시 백 (나비형); 새들 백; 스크류 백; 스레더; 기타
es: Tipo de cierre de pendientes: Parte posterior de bola; Cierre de clic; Con clip; Argolla continua; Ear cuff; Cierre ear jacket; Gancho de pescado; Gancho francés / alambre francés; Argolla con bisagra / a presión; Cierre catalán; Cierre tipo brisura; Magnético; Ninguno; Cierre omega; Poste / cierre a presión (mariposa); Cierre de montura; Cierre de rosca; Enhebrador; Otro
tr: Küpe kapama tipi: Vidalı top; Klikli; Klipsli; Sonsuz halka; Kıkırdak; Kulak ceket arkası; Kanca; Fransız kanca / Fransız tel; Menteşeli halka / yaylı; Mandal arkası; Mandallı; Manyetik; Yok; Omega arkası; Pim / itme arkası (kelebek); Eyer arkası; Vidalı; Geçmeli; Diğer
nl: Type oorbelsluiting: Bolsluiting; Clicker; Clip-on; Eindeloze ring; Earcuff; Ear jacket-sluiting; Vishaak; Franse haak/Franse draad; Scharnierende ring/kliksluiting; Klapsluiting; Brisuresluiting; Magnetisch; Geen; Omegasluiting; Steker/vlindersluiting (push-back); Zadelsluiting; Schroefsluiting; Doortrekker; Anders
sk-SK: Typ zapínania náušníc: Skrutkovacia gulička; Zacvakávací (clicker); Klipové; Nekonečný kruh; Záušnica; Prívesok za ucho (ear jacket); Africký háčik; Francúzsky háčik; Kĺbové / zacvakávacie; Zacvakávacia klapka; Dámsky patent; Magnetické; Žiadne; Zapínanie omega; Puzeta (motýlik); Sedlové zapínanie; Balónik (skrutka); Prevliekacie; Iné
bg-BG: Тип закопчаване на обецата: Винт с топче; Кликър; Клипс; Затворена халка; Кафа; Декоративен гръб; Кукичка; Френска кукичка / Френска тел; Халка с панта / Щракващо закопчаване; Щракващо закопчаване; Английско закопчаване; Магнитно; Без закопчаване; Омега клипс; Щифт / Пеперуда; Седловидно закопчаване; На винт; Промушваща се обица; Друго
cs: Typ zapínání náušnice: Šroubovací kulička; Klapka (clicker); Klip (klipsa); Nekonečný kruh; Záušník (cuff); Puzeta s přívěskem (ear jacket); Africký háček; Francouzský háček / francouzský drát; Kloubové kruhy / ruský patent; Zacvakávací kloub (latch back); Dámský patent; Magnetické; Žádné; Omega klip; Puzeta (motýlek); Sedlové zapínání; Šroubek; Provlékací; Ostatní
de: Ohrring-Verschlusstyp: Kugelverschluss; Clicker; Clip; Endlos-Creole; Ear-Cuff; Ear-Jacket-Verschluss; Fischhaken; Brisur / French Wire; Klapp-Creole / Schnappverschluss; Klappverschluss; Klappbrisur; Magnetisch; Keine; Omega-Verschluss; Stecker / Poussette (Schmetterling); Sattelverschluss; Schraubverschluss; Durchzieher; Sonstige
fi: Korvakorun korvaan kiinnittämisen tyyppi: Pallo; Napsautettava; Klipsi; Yhtenäinen rengas; Ear cuff; Ear jacket -tausta; Koukkukiinnitys; Ranskalainen koukku; Saranoitu rengas / napsautettava; Salpalukko; Napsautettava koukkulukko; Magneettinen; Ei mitään; Omega-lukko; Tappi / perhoslukko; Satulalukko; Ruuvilukko; Läpivedettävä; Muu
en: Earring closure type: Ball back; Clicker; Clip-on; Continuous hoop; Ear cuff; Ear jacket back; Fish hook; French hook / French wire; Hinged hoop / snap; Latch back; Leverback; Magnetic; None; Omega back; Post / push back (butterfly); Saddle back; Screw back; Threader; Other
th: ประเภทตัวล็อกต่างหู: แป้นบอล; คลิกเกอร์; แบบหนีบ; ห่วงไร้รอยต่อ; เอียร์คัฟ; แป้นเอียร์แจ็กเกต; ตะขอฟิชฮุก; ตะขอฝรั่งเศส / ลวดฝรั่งเศส; ห่วงบานพับ / แป้นล็อก; แป้นก้านพับ; ตะขอก้านสปริง; แม่เหล็ก; ไม่มี; แป้นโอเมกา; ก้านเสียบ / แป้นกด (ผีเสื้อ); แป้นอานม้า; แป้นเกลียว; แบบร้อยหู; อื่นๆ
da: Øreringslukningstype: Kuglebagside; Kliklås; Clip-on; Endeløs ring; Ear cuff; Ear jacket-bagside; Fiskekrog; Fransk krog; Hængslet creol/klik; Hængsellås; Brisur; Magnetisk; Ingen; Omegalås; Stift/sommerfuglelås; Sadellås; Skruelås; Tråd; Anden
hr-HR: Vrsta zatvaranja naušnice: Kuglica; Kliker (clicker); Na kopču; Kontinuirani krug; Naušnica za hrskavicu (ear cuff); Ear jacket pozadina; Udica; Francuska udica / francuska žica; Obruč sa šarkom / na pritisak; Na preklop; Polužna kopča (leverback); Magnetna; Bez kopče; Omega kopča; Iglica / leptir osigurač; Sedlasta kopča; Na navoj; Provlačna; Ostalo
ru: Тип застежки серьги: С закруткой-шариком; Кликер; Клипса; Сплошное кольцо; Кафф; Джекеты; Французский замок (крючок); Французский замок / петля; Кольцо с защелкой / конго; Английский замок; Французский замок с петелькой; Магнитный замок; Нет; Итальянский замок (Омега); Пуссеты / гвоздики (бабочка); Замок-булавка; Винтовой замок; Продевки (цепочки); Другое
pl: Styl zapięcia kolczyków: Wkrętka z kulką; Zapięcie typu clicker; Na klips; Kółko; Nausznica; Zapięcie typu ear jacket; Bigiel otwarty; Bigiel zamknięty; Zapięcie zatrzaskowe; Zapięcie typu liza; Bigiel angielski; Magnetyczne; Brak; Zapięcie typu omega; Sztyft / baranek; Zapięcie typu siodło; Sztyft zakręcany; Przeciągane (threader); Inne
nb: Lukketype for ørering: Kulebakstykke; Klikklås; Klips; Kontinuerlig ring; Ear cuff; Ear jacket-bakstykke; Fiskekrok; Fransk krok / fransk wire; Hengslet ring / knepplås; Vippelås; Bøylelås; Magnetisk; Ingen; Omegalås; Stift / bakstykke (sommerfugl); Sadel; Skrubakstykke; Trådkjede; Annet
zh-TW: 耳環扣類型: 圓珠耳扣; 按扣式; 夾式; 無縫耳圈; 耳骨夾; 耳環套飾; 魚鉤式; 法式耳鉤 / 法式耳線; 鉸鏈耳圈 / 彈簧扣; 鎖扣式; 法式扣; 磁吸式; 無; 歐米茄扣; 耳針 / 蝴蝶扣; 馬鞍扣; 螺旋耳扣; 穿線式; 其他